Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Chapter 6

County Clerks

18-6-101. Election — Term of office — Clerk of county legislative body.

The county clerks are elected by the qualified voters of the respective counties over which the local jurisdiction of the county legislative body, respectively, extends.

Their term of office is four (4) years.

The county clerk shall be the clerk of the county legislative body.

If any vacancy occurs in the office of county clerk, the vacancy shall be filled as provided for in § 5-1-104(b).

Code 1858, § 324 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 13); Shan., § 400; mod. Code 1932, § 650; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 7; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-601; modified; Acts 1981, ch. 318, § 8.

Cross-References. Annual audit, §4-3-304.

Appointment and term of office of attorney general and reporter, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 5.

Consolidated retirement system, title 8, chs. 34-37, 39.

County clerk to be elected, term of office, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 1.

Deputies and assistants, title 8, chapter 20.

Incompetence to act, §§5-6-114,5-6-115.

Retirement system for county officials (superseded), Vol. 3, Appendix.

Salary, §§8-24-101 —8-24-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 6; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 18.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. County court clerks:

Ark. Code §14-14-1301 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-6-50 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 64.005 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §9-9-29.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 51.010 et seq.

Cited: Carver v. Dennis, 886 F. Supp. 636, 1995 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6927 (M.D. Tenn. 1995).

Collateral References. Clerk of Courts
7.

18-6-102. Name change.

County court clerk shall assume the title “county clerk.”

The county clerk shall assume all the duties of the county court clerk and all statutes referring to county court clerks shall apply with equal force and effect to the county clerk.

The office of county clerk shall remain an office in this state regardless of the abolition of any county quarterly court.

Code 1858, § 324 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 13); Shan., § 400; mod. Code 1932, § 650; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 7; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-601; modified.

Cross-References. County clerk as clerk of county legislative body, §18-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 6.

18-6-103. Certain boards of commissioners authorized to appoint own clerks.

Notwithstanding the duties prescribed for the county clerk in chapters 1 and 2 of this title and §§ 18-6-101, 18-6-102 and 18-6-104, the board of commissioners in any county with a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more is authorized to employ its own clerk to serve at its meetings and to employ its own clerical and administrative help reasonably necessary to take the minutes of its meetings and to transcribe the minutes, subject to the approval of the board of commissioners, as official records of the county.

The board of commissioners shall appropriate such funds as are necessary to cover the cost of the clerk and staff provided for in subsection (a).

Acts 1980, ch. 667, § 1; T.C.A., § 18-601; modified.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

18-6-104. Duties as clerk.

The county clerk, in addition to the duties prescribed by chapters 1 and 2 of this title, is required, as clerk to:

Act as clerk of the county legislative body;

Keep a docket of all the causes to be tried in the court;

Enter upon the docket every suit, motion and action that may come before the court for trial;

Produce to the judge of the circuit court, for the judge's examination at the first circuit court in the judge's county after the first Monday in April in each year, on the second day of the term, the bonds of all officers taken during such year by the county legislative body;

Spread on the records of court every bond required to be recorded; and

Receive and preserve the journals of congress, statutes and other public documents entrusted to the county clerk by law, and deliver them to the county clerk's successor.

Code 1858, § 4067 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 6, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 103, § 11; 1847-1848, ch. 113; 1855-1856, ch. 253, §§ 7, 10, 11); Shan., § 5882; Code 1932, § 10082; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-602.

Compiler's Notes. The term “court” in subdivisions (2), (3) and (5) apparently refers to the judicial authority formerly residing in the monthly county court.

Cross-References. Authentication of instruments by or to clerk, §66-22-105.

Bond for disbursement of assessments for proposed levee, improvement or drainage district, §69-6-130.

Bond for levee and drainage assessment collections, §69-6-113.

Certain boards of commissioners authorized to appoint own clerks, §18-6-103.

Copy of probate or acknowledgment, §10-7-109.

County clerk as clerk of county legislative body, §18-6-101.

Drainage assessment book for district in more than one county, preparation, entries, certified copy to trustee of other county, §69-5-1104.

Drainage assessment book showing extended assessments of refunding bonds, §69-5-926.

Drainage record book, keeping, §69-5-140.

Drainage record book, sale of tract for collection of assessment, recording, §69-5-816.

Fees for additional services for drainage districts, §69-5-141.

Fees for services with respect to, road improvement districts, §54-12-157.

Fees for specified duties rendered in connection with motor vehicle registration act, §55-6-104.

Funds from special assessment for proposed levee, improvement or drainage district turned over to for disbursement, §69-5-127.

Marks or brands of cattle, fee for recording, §44-7-109.

Motor vehicle registration law, duties, §55-6-105.

Pedigreed male animals for breeding, fee for registering, §44-7-301.

Record kept of proceedings to hospitalize mentally ill person, §33-3-502.

Refunding bonds for outstanding indebtedness of any drainage or levee district, jurisdiction to issue, §69-5-921.

Road improvement assessment book duty to make, §54-12-410.

Road improvement record book, maintenance and use, §54-12-156.

Specific fees authorized, §8-21-401, title 8, ch. 21, part 7.

Summons, issuance for hearing on proposed levee, improvement or drainage district, §69-5-120.

Tobacco warehousing and sale law, attending prosecutions for violations, §43-19-112.

Warehouse proprietor, administering oath to as tobacco inspector, §43-19-201.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

18-6-105. Duties as to revenue.

The county clerk has the following duties in regard to revenue:

List in a book provided for that purpose all appropriations and allowances made by the county legislative body, all claims of jurors and officers for attendance, or other claim chargeable against the county, setting forth the character, description and for what purpose made, including the date and amount of the allowance, and the book and page of the minutes where the order may be found;

Issue orders or certificates to the parties entitled and endorse on the orders or certificates that they have been registered in the county clerk's office. The endorsement shall be necessary to authorize the county mayor to issue the county mayor's warrant for the amount;

Make out at the first meeting of the county legislative body in each year a balance sheet of revenue and disbursements of the county for the preceding year, giving the several sources of the revenue and items of disbursement plainly, and post the sheet on the outside wall of the courthouse;

Perform the acts in relation to state revenue prescribed in title 8, chapter 19, title 9, chapters 2 and 3, title 26, chapter 5, title 30, chapter 8, parts 2-5, title 57, chapter 5, parts 1-4 and title 67; and

Collect franchise fees pursuant to franchise agreements with municipalities, if so authorized by resolution of the legislative body of any municipality having a metropolitan form of government and a population of over four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Collect the enrollment fees and provide decals in connection with municipal programs to combat auto theft, if so authorized by ordinance of the legislative body of any municipality having a metropolitan form of government and a population of over four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Any powers concerning fee or tax collection that may be granted to the county clerk by the legislative body of any municipality having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall not affect the powers granted to the director of finance under the charter of the municipality to make decisions concerning the official depository for fees and taxes as well as depository procedures. The county clerk shall not receive a commission for receiving and paying over the fees and taxes.

Code 1858, § 4068 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, §§ 16, 27); Shan., § 5883; Code 1932, § 10083; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 12, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-603; Acts 1994, ch. 758, § 6; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Accounting for fees, title 8, chapter 22.

Bond for assessments collected for drainage or levee district, §69-5-805.

Delivery of jury lists by circuit court clerk, §18-4-103.

Fees for services, title 8, ch. 21, parts 4, 7.

Inheritance tax law, duties, §67-8-406.

Payment for office supplies, §8-26-104.

Report and payment of revenues, §§9-2-108 —9-2-122.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

18-6-106. Administration of estates.

Notwithstanding any law or public, private, special or local act to the contrary, no county clerk shall serve as clerk of a court with probate jurisdiction. In any county in which the county clerk is performing this function, the duties as to administration of estates and guardian appointments shall be vested in either the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction or the clerk and master. In any county in which the county clerk is the only clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction, these duties shall be transferred to the clerk and master.

Subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

44,200 44,300

71,100 71,200

In the counties listed in subdivision (a)(2)(A), the county clerk shall continue to serve as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction and the clerk shall continue to exercise the same powers and duties as it exercised on June 30, 2003.

Subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

Effective July 1, 2014, in counties having a population of not less than forty-one thousand (41,000) nor more than forty-one thousand one hundred (41,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all clerical duties and responsibilities for the probate court currently exercised by the circuit court clerk shall transfer to the clerk and master. On such date, the clerk and master shall assume all duties and responsibilities with respect to the administration of estates, guardian appointments and other probate matters. All probate files, records and other documents maintained for the probate court in such counties shall be transferred to the custody of the clerk and master.

The clerk of the court having probate jurisdiction has the following duties as to the administration of estates:

Administer to every administrator or executor an oath to perform the will of the deceased, or for the faithful performance of the administrator's or executor's duty; provided, that in the alternative, the oath of the administrator or executor may be sworn or affirmed in the presence of a notary public and the acknowledgment of the representative's oath, when certified by the notary public, shall be presented to the appropriate clerk;

Except as provided in § 30-1-201, take from every such representative a bond, with two (2) or more able sureties, or one (1) corporate surety, in an amount not exceeding double the value of the estate and not less than the value of the estate, payable to the state of Tennessee, conditioned as is shown in § 30-1-203;

Issue to the representative letters of administration or testamentary, authorizing the representative to administer the estate of the deceased;

Receive of every administrator or executor the inventory the administrator or executor may return of the decedent's estate, and cause the administrator or executor to verify it by the administrator's or executor's oath, and present the inventory to the court;

Record the inventory, if it be found regular by the court, in the book of inventories;

Receive from every personal representative the personal representative's account of sales, and cause the personal representative to verify the account of sales by the personal representative's oath, and present the account of sales to the court, and record the account of sales if the court finds the account of sales regular;

Take and state, once every year, in vacation, at the clerk's office, the accounts of every personal representative of any deceased person, after the lapse of fifteen (15) months from the personal representative's qualification;

Compel the accounting party, by subpoena, to come before the clerk once every year for the purpose of settling the accounting party's accounts;

Present to the court, in writing, the names of those personal representatives and guardians who refuse to answer the subpoena, or who fail to settle; and also the names of the minors in their county, of the clerk's knowledge, whose guardians are in default, and the sureties of whose guardians are dead, removed out of the state or become insolvent;

Examine the accounting party, when it seems necessary, upon oath, touching the accounting party's receipts and disbursements;

Continue the settlement, from time to time, on cause shown by affidavit;

Charge such party with all such sums as the party has received or might have received by using due diligence; and credit such party with such disbursements as the party supports by lawful vouchers, and with a reasonable compensation for the party's services;

Report the account to the next court having probate jurisdiction for confirmation or rejection;

Record the settlement when it is finally adjusted by the court;

Serve every party, resident in the clerk's county, that is interested in the account, or the agent or attorney of such as reside elsewhere, with five (5) days' notice of taking such account, and take no account of any administration until such notice has been given;

Record all refunding bonds lodged with the clerk by any personal representative, taken from distributees, and file and preserve the originals in the clerk's office; and

Perform all the duties required of the clerk in the administration of insolvent estates of deceased persons.

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4069 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 3; 1813, ch. 120, § 4; 1831, ch. 29, § 2; 1837-1838, ch. 125, §§ 1-4; 1851-1852, ch. 180, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 215, § 2); Shan., § 5884; Code 1932, § 10084; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-604; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 55, § 2; 1985, ch. 140, § 4; 1993, ch. 449, § 1; 2003, ch. 310, §§ 2, 6-10; 2004, ch. 463, § 1; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 115, § 1; 2006, ch. 528, § 1; 2011, ch. 417, § 1; 2012, ch. 654, § 1; 2014, ch. 756, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 756 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a)(2)(A), deleted “not less than 62,900 nor more than 63,000” from the population table.

The 2012 amendment, in (a)(2)(A), deleted “not less than 105,800 nor more than 105,900” from the population table.

The 2014 amendment added (a)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 417, § 5. July 1, 2011.

Acts 2012, ch. 654, § 2. April 4, 2012.

Acts 2014, ch. 756, § 3. April 21, 2014. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Chancery court to exercise probate jurisdiction, §§16-16-201,16-16-202.

Decedents' estates, account of representatives, taking and stating, title 30, ch. 2, part 6.

Fees for accounting made in decedents' estates, §30-2-611.

Nonresident executor or administrator, service upon clerk, §30-1-104.

Notice of accounting in decedents' estates given by, §30-2-603.

Probate jurisdiction, §§16-16-201,16-16-202,30-1-102,30-1-301,32-4-101,32-5-101.

Wills, original to remain in office, §32-2-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 663, 725, 836-839, 845, 1143.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Attorney General Opinions. Probate functions now performed by the Unicoi County court clerk under 1981 Tenn. Priv. Acts Ch. 98 must be transferred to the clerk of the Unicoi County General Sessions Court or the clerk and master no later than July 1, 2006, OAG 03-143 (11/07/03).

Legislation regarding Carter county probate clerks, OAG 06-088 (5/15/06).

Collateral References.

Power of court, in absence of statute, to require corporate surety on fiduciary bond in probate proceeding. 82 A.L.R.2d 926.

18-6-107. Duties as to guardians.

The county clerk has the duty to enter in particular books, to be provided and kept for that purpose only, every guardian's first account of the guardian's ward's estate, received into the guardian's hands and possession, and each annual account of profits and disbursements afterwards exhibited by such guardian.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4070 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, § 9); Shan., § 5885; Code 1932, § 10085; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-605; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 3, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

18-6-108. Probate of instruments.

The county clerk has the duty to take the probate or acknowledgment of all deeds and other instruments that are entitled to registration by law, and to certify the same for registration, and to demand and receive the state tax thereon, as specified in title 67, chapter 4, part 4.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4072 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 92, § 15; 1835-1836, ch. 53, § 6; 1837-1838, ch. 150, § 1); Shan., § 5887; Code 1932, § 10086; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-606; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 4, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

18-6-109. Duties as to marriages.

The county clerk has the following duties as to marriages:

To endorse on or append to the marriage license the form of the return; and

To register, in a well-bound book, the names of the parties, and the date of the issuance of a marriage license, and to copy immediately, under or opposite thereto, the return of the proper functionary who solemnized the rites of matrimony, with the date thereof, and file and retain the license and return thereof in such clerk's office or other suitable facility.

The records described in subdivision (a)(2) are public records.

As used in this section, “suitable facility” means a facility that stores local government records securely against theft and natural disasters.

Code 1858, § 4073 (deriv. Acts 1815, ch. 47, § 1; 1837-1838, ch. 118, § 2); Shan., § 5888; Code 1932, § 10087; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-607; Acts 1993, ch. 418, § 1; 2019, ch. 79, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “or other suitable facility” at the end of (a)(2); and added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 79, § 4. April 3, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of county clerks to examine qualifications of persons who solemnize marriages, OAG 97-139 (10/09/97).

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
69.

18-6-110. Record of appointments and settlements.

The county clerk has the duty to record in well-bound books all letters testamentary and of administration, all guardian appointments and all settlements made by the clerk with guardians and personal representatives.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4074 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 7); Shan., § 5889; Code 1932, § 10088; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-608; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 5, 6-10; 2005 ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 587.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

18-6-111. Other duties.

The county clerk is required to perform such other duties as are, or may be, by law required of the county clerk.

Code 1858, § 4075; Shan., § 5890; Code 1932, § 10091; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-609.

18-6-112. Incompetency of clerk.

Whenever the county clerk is incompetent, because of interest or relationship, to do or perform any official act required by law to be done by the county clerk, it shall be lawful and is the duty of the county mayor or appropriate judge to do and perform the act.

When the clerk is incompetent to take and state any account, the account shall be taken and stated by a special commissioner, to be appointed by the chancellor as provided by law.

Acts 1871, ch. 42, § 1; Shan., § 5891; Code 1932, § 10092; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-610; modified; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Appointment of special commissioner by chancellor, §21-1-104.

County mayor acting for clerk, §5-6-114.

Incompetency of clerk, §5-6-115.

18-6-113. Depositions.

The county clerks are authorized and empowered to take depositions in any legal proceeding to the same extent and after the same manner as notaries public, and in taking such depositions the clerks shall attest the depositions under their official seals, and for such services shall be entitled to the same compensation as notaries public.

Acts 1923, ch. 96, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 5891a1; mod. Code 1932, § 10089; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-611.

Cross-References. Persons before whom depositions to be taken, §24-9-135.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts §§ 33-36, 90.

Clerks of Courts
45.

18-6-114. Oaths and affidavits.

The county clerks are authorized and empowered to take affidavits and administer oaths for general purposes to the same extent as judges of the courts of general sessions and notaries public.

They shall attest the affidavits and oaths under their official seals or the seals of their respective courts.

As compensation for their services in taking any such affidavit or oath and so attesting the affidavit or oath, they shall be entitled to receive the sum of twenty-five cents (25¢), to be paid by the party whose affidavit or oath is so taken.

This section shall not affect the fees provided by law for such clerks incident to their duties in their respective courts.

Acts 1923, ch. 96, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 5891a2; mod. Code 1932, § 10090; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-612.

Compiler's Notes. The language “respective courts” in this section apparently refers to the judicial authority formerly residing in the monthly county courts.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 38.

Affidavits
5.

18-6-115. Vacancies.

If the office of the county clerk becomes vacant due to death, resignation or removal, the duties of the county clerk shall be temporarily discharged by the chief deputy, or deputy designated as temporary successor by the county clerk in writing, until a successor county clerk is elected or appointed and qualified according to law.

Acts 1993, ch. 315, § 19.